Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.020

Department created.

A department of the government of this state to be known as the "department of licensing" is hereby created.

[ 1979 c 158 s 114; 1977 ex.s. c 334 s 2; 1965 c 156 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 334: See note following RCW 46.01.011.